New York, session 2025-2026, A693.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Subdivision 1, paragraph (g) of subdivision 2 and paragraph 2 (b) of subdivision 3 of section 646-a of the executive law, as amended 3 by a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the executive law relating to 4 certain notifications and the rights of crime victims, as proposed in 5 legislative bills numbers S. 5502 and A. 4199, are amended to read as 6 follows: 7 1. The district attorney [or the court] shall provide the victim, 8 parent or guardian of a minor, or a surviving family member in the case 9 of homicide, at the time of sentencing or at the earliest time possible, 10 with an informational pamphlet detailing the rights of crime victims 11 which shall be prepared by the division of criminal justice services in 12 consultation with the director of the office of victim services and the 13 office of victim assistance, and distributed to each district attorney's 14 office. 15 (g) the rights of crime victims to be aware of the defendant's incar- 16 ceration status by providing the [state board of parole's] department of 17 corrections and community supervision's contact information, including 18 the [board's] office of victim assistance's toll-free telephone number, 19 as provided for in subdivision two of section two hundred fifty-nine-i 20 of this chapter. Such notice shall advise the crime victim to use the 21 [board's] office of victim assistance's toll-free telephone number to 22 update contact information; 23 (b) the address and phone number of the department of corrections and 24 community supervision's office of victim assistance; EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD02911-01-5 A. 693 2 1 § 2. This act shall take effect on the same date and in the same 2 manner as a chapter of the laws of 2024 amending the executive law 3 relating to certain notifications and the rights of crime victims, as 4 proposed in legislative bills numbers S. 5502 and A. 4199, takes effect.